Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
Article 3. Personal Identification Cards for Persons With Disabilities.

§ 45-35-51.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of the Department of Public Safety.

“Department” means Department of Public Safety.

“Disability” means any physical, mental or neurological impairment which severely restricts a person’s mobility, manual dexterity or ability to climb stairs; substantial loss of sight or hearing; loss of one or more limbs or use thereof; or significantly diminished reasoning capacity.

“Identification card for persons with disabilities” means an identification card issued as provided in this article.

“Permanent disability” means any disability which is permanent in nature or which is expected to continue for a period of at least five (5) years.

“Person with disabilities” means any person with a permanent or temporary disability.

“Temporary disability” means any disability which is expected to continue for at least six (6) months but less than five (5) years.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 464, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 45-35-53.
Issuance of personal identification card; information to be included on card.

The Department of Public Safety shall issue personal identification cards to persons with disabilities who make application to the department in accordance with rules and regulations prescribed by the commissioner by filing with the Secretary of State under the Administrative Procedures Act. The identification card for persons with disabilities shall prominently display the international handicapped symbol and, in addition to any other information required by this article, may contain a recent color photograph of the applicant and the following information:

Full legal name;

Address of residence;

Birth date;

Date identification card was issued;

Date identification card expires;

Sex;

Height;

Weight;

Eye color;

Location where the identification card was issued;

Signature of person identified or facsimile thereof; and

Such other information as required by the department.

The identification card for persons with disabilities shall bear an identification card number which shall not be the same as the applicant’s social security number. The commissioner shall prescribe the form of identification cards issued pursuant to this article to persons who are not United States citizens. The identification cards of such persons shall include a number and any other identifying information prescribed by the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 464, § 2; Laws, 2014, ch. 424, § 5, eff from and after Oct. 1, 2014.

§ 45-35-55.
Issuance of cards to persons with permanent disabilities and renewal thereof; issuance of cards to persons with temporary disabilities and renewal thereof.

The identification card for persons with disabilities shall be issued to a person with a permanent disability for a period of four (4) years, shall expire at midnight on the cardholder’s birthday, and may be renewed any time within six (6) months before the expiration date of the card upon application and payment of the required fee. The identification cards shall be issued to persons with disabilities upon presentation of the current sworn affidavit of at least one (1) medical doctor attesting to such permanent disability. A current affidavit shall be presented at each request for renewal.

The identification card for persons with temporary disabilities shall be issued to a person with a temporary disability upon presentation of a sworn affidavit of at least one (1) medical doctor attesting to the disability and estimating the duration of the disability. Temporary disability identification cards shall be issued for periods of six (6) months. A current affidavit of a medical doctor attesting to the continuance of the disability shall be presented at each request for renewal thereafter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 464, § 3; Laws, 2014, ch. 424, § 6, eff from and after Oct. 1, 2014.

§ 45-35-57.
Special transportation services for persons with disabilities.

The face of the identification card for persons with disabilities shall bear the word “TRANSPORTATION” with a box or blank space adjacent thereto. The issuer of the card shall place an “X” in such box or blank space if the applicant’s disability creates mobility limitations which prevent him or her from climbing stairs or otherwise from entering normally designed buses or other vehicles normally used for public transportation. When so marked, the identification card for persons with disabilities shall serve as sufficient proof of the need for special transportation services for persons with disabilities provided by any entity in this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 464, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 45-35-59.
Special seating for persons with disabilities.

The identification card for persons with disabilities shall bear the word “SEATING” with a box or blank space adjacent thereto. The issuer of the card shall place an “X” in such box or blank space if the applicant’s disability creates mobility or health limitations which prevent him or her from climbing stairs or steep inclines. When so marked, the identification card for persons with disabilities shall be sufficient to admit the holder to seating for persons with disabilities at public events in this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 464, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 45-35-61.
Rules and regulations.

The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations under which this article shall be implemented.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 464, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 45-35-63.
Proof of date of birth.

The department shall require an applicant for an identification card for persons with disabilities to furnish a birth certificate or other verifiable evidence stating the applicant’s birth date.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 464, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 45-35-65.
Fee.

The department shall collect a fee for an identification card for persons with disabilities as prescribed in Section 63-1-43.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 464, § 8; Laws, 2014, ch. 424, § 7, eff from and after Oct. 1, 2014.

§ 45-35-67.
Misuse of identification card a misdemeanor.

It is a misdemeanor for any person:

To lend his or her identification card for persons with disabilities to any other person or knowingly to permit the use thereof by another; and

To display or represent as his or her own any identification card for persons with disabilities not issued to him or her.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 464, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2005.